California, session 20252026, AB1353.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11011.9.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:11011.9.5. (a) The legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The state owns an excess of land that has the potential to be suitable for conversion to affordable housing, use for other state agencies, and usable retail space.(2) While the Department of General Services has made efforts to identify buildings in order to convert excess state properties into affordable housing, the change in remote work patterns necessitates an effort to maximize utilization for state-owned office buildings that are not candidates for disposal and conversion.(3) It is in the interest of the Legislature, on behalf of the people of California, to ensure this problem is treated with expediency.(b) For the purposes of this section, “department” means the Department of General Services.(c) No later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall conduct an audit of the suite-level, floor-level, and building-level utilization of state office buildings to determine opportunities to consolidate the square footage of office space given to a state agency without reducing the total number of employees within the department.(d) The department is authorized to, and shall, consolidate space within a state office building at the suite, floor, and building level, in accordance with the findings of an audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (c).(e) Any space made available by the consolidation in subdivision (d) shall be reserved for use by the University of California, California State University, and the California Community Colleges.SECTION 1.Section 65582.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:65582.1.The Legislature finds and declares that it has provided reforms and incentives to facilitate and expedite the construction of affordable housing. Those reforms and incentives can be found in the following provisions:(a)Housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3).(b)Extension of statute of limitations in actions challenging the housing element and brought in support of affordable housing (subdivision (d) of Section 65009).(c)Restrictions on disapproval of housing developments (Section 65589.5).(d)Priority for affordable housing in the allocation of water and sewer hookups (Section 65589.7).(e)Least cost zoning law (Section 65913.1).(f)Density bonus law (Section 65915).(g)Accessory dwelling units (Section 66310 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) of Chapter 13).(h)By-right housing, in which certain multifamily housing is designated a permitted use (Section 65589.4).(i)No-net-loss-in zoning density law limiting downzonings and density reductions (Section 65863).(j)Requiring persons who sue to halt affordable housing to pay attorney’s fees (Section 65914) or post a bond (Section 529.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure).(k)Reduced time for action on affordable housing applications under the approval of development permits process (Article 5 (commencing with Section 65950) of Chapter 4.5).(l)Limiting moratoriums on multifamily housing (Section 65858).(m)Prohibiting discrimination against affordable housing (Section 65008).(n)California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2).(o)Community redevelopment law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code, and in particular Sections 33334.2 and 33413).(p)Streamlining housing approvals during a housing shortage (Section 65913.4).(q)Housing sustainability districts (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 66200)).(r)Streamlining agricultural employee housing development approvals (Section 17021.8 of the Health and Safety Code).